District of Columbia statutes.
29-910

Meetings; regular and special.

Regular meetings of members shall be held as prescribed in the bylaws, but shall be held at least once a year. Special meetings may be demanded by a majority vote of the directors or by written petition of at least 10% of the membership, in which case it shall be the duty of the secretary to call such meeting to take place within 30 days after the demand. Regular or special meetings, including meetings by units as hereinafter provided, may be held inside or outside the District as the articles may prescribe. If authorized by the articles or bylaws, members may participate in regular and special meetings of members remotely in accordance with § 29-305.09.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(i)(4), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-910.
1981 Ed., § 29-1110.
1973 Ed., § 29-810.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added the last sentence.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.